North Carolina, session 2025, SB110.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 6 of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes is amended by
designating G.S. 147-65 through G.S. 147-86.6 as Part 1 with the heading "General Provisions,
Powers, and Duties; Investment; and Funds."
SECTION 2. Article 6 of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new Part to read:
"Part 2. North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings Program.
"§ 147-86.7A. Title.
This Part shall be known as the "North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings
Program" or "North Carolina Work and Save."
"§ 147-86.7B. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Part:
*S110-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Administrative Fund. – The North Carolina Small Business Retirement
Savings Administrative Fund established in G.S. 147-86.7V.
(2) Board. – The North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings Program
Board.
(3) Covered employee. – An individual who is employed by a covered employer,
who has wages or other compensation that is allocable to the State, and who
is at least 18 years of age. A covered employee does not include any of the
following:
a. Any employee covered under the federal Railway Labor Act (45
U.S.C. § 151).
b. Any employee on whose behalf an employer makes contributions to a
Taft-Hartley multiemployer pension trust fund.
c. Any individual who is an employee of the federal government, the
State or any other state, any county or municipal corporation, or any
of the State's, any other state's, or the federal government's units or
instrumentalities.
(4) Covered employer. – A person or entity engaged in a business, industry,
profession, trade, or other enterprise in the State, whether for-profit or not for
profit, excluding the federal government, the State, any county, any
municipality, or any political subdivision of the State, and provided that
covered employer does not include an employer that maintains a specified
tax-favored retirement plan for its employees or has done so effective in form
and operation at any time within the current or two preceding calendar years.
If an employer does not maintain a specified tax-favored retirement plan for a
portion of a calendar year ending on or after the effective date of this Part and
adopts such a plan effective for the remainder of that calendar year, the
employer is exempt from covered employer status for that remainder of the
year.
(4a) Department. – The Department of State Treasurer.
(5) ERISA. – The Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
amended (29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.).
(6) Internal Revenue Code. – The Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended
(Title 26 of the United States Code).
(7) IRA. – A traditional or Roth individual retirement account or individual
retirement annuity.
(8) Participant. – An individual who is contributing to an IRA under the Program
or has an IRA account balance under the Program.
(9) Participating employer. – A covered employer that provides for covered
employees a payroll deduction IRA provided for by this Part.
(10) Payroll deduction IRA arrangement or payroll deduction IRA. – An
arrangement by which an employer allows employees to contribute to an IRA
by means of payroll deduction.
(11) Program or North Carolina Work and Save Program. – The Small Business
Retirement Savings Program established by this Part.
(12) Roth IRA. – A Roth individual retirement account or individual retirement
annuity under section 408A of the Internal Revenue Code.
(13) Specified tax-favored retirement plan. – A retirement plan that is tax-qualified
under or is described in and satisfies the requirements of subsection 401(a),
401(k), 403(a), 403(b), 408(k) (Simplified Employee Pension), or 408(p)
(SIMPLE-IRA) of the Internal Revenue Code.
Page 2 Senate Bill 110-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(14) Total fees and expenses. – All fees, costs, and expenses, including, but not
limited to, administrative expenses, investment expenses, investment advice
expenses, accounting costs, actuarial costs, legal costs, marketing expenses,
education expenses, trading costs, insurance annuitization costs, and other
miscellaneous costs.
(15) Traditional IRA. – A traditional individual retirement account or traditional
individual retirement annuity under subsection 408(a) or (b) of the Internal
Revenue Code.
(16) Trust. – The trust in which the assets of the Program are held. Where
applicable, except as may be otherwise specified, references throughout this
Part to the Program generally are intended to refer also to the Trust, including
the assets, facilities, costs and expenses, receipts, expenditures, activities,
operations, administration, or management.
"§ 147-86.7C. Establishment of Board.
(a) The North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings Board is established for
administrative purposes in the Department of State Treasurer, but the Board shall exercise its
powers and duties independently of the Department. The Department shall provide
administrative support for the Board in carrying out its duties pursuant to this Part.
(b) The Board shall consist of 12 members.
(1) Ten voting members shall be appointed as follows:
a. The State Treasurer shall appoint a member who has a favorable
reputation for skill, knowledge, and experience in retirement
investment products or retirement plan designs.
b. Five members appointed by the Governor as follows:
1. One member who has a favorable reputation for skill,
knowledge, and experience in retirement investment products
or retirement plan designs.
2. One member who has a favorable reputation for skill,
knowledge, and experience relating to small business or
covered employers.
3. One member from the Office of State Budget and Management
or other designee knowledgeable about fiscal impacts.
4. One member who is an employee of the Department of State
Treasurer.
5. One member of the public.
c. Two members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives as
follows:
1. One member who is a retired individual or an individual who
represents persons retired to be a representative of the interests
of retirees.
2. One member who has a favorable reputation for skill,
knowledge, and experience in the interests of employers in
retirement saving.
d. Two members appointed by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate as
follows:
1. One member who is a representative of an association
representing employees or who has a favorable reputation for
skill, knowledge, and experience in the interests of employees
in retirement saving.
Senate Bill 110-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. One member who has a favorable reputation for skill,
knowledge, and experience in retirement investment products
or retirement plan designs.
(2) In addition to the 10 voting members, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one
nonvoting advisory member.
(c) All initial appointments shall be made no later than October 1, 2025. Of the initial
five appointments made by the Governor, two shall be appointed for four-year terms, two shall
be appointed for two-year terms, and one shall be appointed for a one-year term, with all terms
to begin on October 1, 2025. Of the initial two appointments made by the General Assembly
upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, one shall be appointed for
a four-year term and one shall be appointed for a two-year term, with both terms to begin on
October 1, 2025. Of the initial two appointments made by the General Assembly upon the
recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one shall be appointed for a
four-year term and one shall be appointed for a two-year term, with both terms to begin on
October 1, 2025. The initial appointment by the State Treasurer shall be for a term of three years
to begin on October 1, 2025. All successors shall be appointed for four-year terms. All members
of the Board shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority.
(d) Members of the Board shall serve without compensation and shall receive per diem,
subsistence, and travel allowances as provided in G.S. 138-5 and G.S. 138-6 as applicable.
(e) The Governor shall convene the first meeting of the Board no later than October 15,
2025. A majority of the voting members of the Board constitutes a quorum. The first order of
business before the Board shall be to elect a chair from among the Board's membership. A
vacancy in the membership of the Board shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise the
powers and duties of the Board.
"§ 147-86.7D. Powers and duties of the Board.
(a) The Board shall have the following powers and duties, subject to its authority and
fiduciary duty:
(1) Design, develop, implement, maintain, govern, and promulgate rules with
respect to a payroll deduction retirement savings program for covered
employers and, to that end, may conduct market, legal, and feasibility
analyses.
(2) Elect a chair and other officers it deems necessary.
(3) Meet as necessary to perform its duties.
(4) Appoint an executive director, who shall be the chief administrative officer of
the Board.
(5) Retain trustees, record keepers, investment managers, investment advisors,
and other administrative, professional, expert advisors and service providers,
none of whom shall be members of the Board and all of whom shall serve at
the pleasure of the Board, and determine their duties and compensation. The
Board may authorize the executive director and other officials to oversee
requests for proposals or other public competitions and enter into contracts on
behalf of the Board and conduct any business necessary for the efficient
operation of the Board.
(6) Cause the Program, Trust, and arrangements and accounts established under
the Program to be designed, established, and operated:
a. In accordance with best practices for retirement saving vehicles.
b. To encourage participation, saving, sound investment practices, and
appropriate selection of investment options, including any default
investments.
Page 4 Senate Bill 110-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
c. To maximize simplicity and ease of administration for covered
employers.
d. To arrange for collective, common, and pooled investment of assets of
the Program and Trust, including investments in conjunction with
other funds with which these assets are permitted by law to be
collectively invested, with a view to achieving economies of scale and
other efficiencies designed to minimize costs for the Program and its
participants, to promote portability of benefits.
e. To avoid preemption of the Program by federal law (Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.).
(7) Develop and implement an investment policy that defines the Program's
investment objectives, consistent with the objectives of the Program, and that
provides for policies and procedures consistent with those investment
objectives. The Board shall designate appropriate default investments that
include a mix of asset classes, such as target date and balanced funds. The
Board shall seek to minimize participant fees and expenses of investment and
administration. The Board shall strive to design and implement investment
options available to holders of accounts established as part of the Program and
other Program features that are intended to achieve maximum possible income
replacement balanced with an appropriate level of risk in an IRA-based
environment consistent with the investment objectives under the policy. The
investment options may encompass a range of risk and return opportunities
and allow for a rate of return commensurate with an appropriate level of risk
in view of the investment objectives under the policy. The menu of investment
options shall be determined taking into account the nature and objectives of
the Program, the desirability based on behavioral research findings of limiting
investment choices under the Program to a reasonable number, and the
extensive investment choices available to participants in the event that they
roll over to an IRA outside the Program.
(8) Set and collect necessary fees from covered employees for application,
account, or administrative processing and accept any grants, gifts, legislative
appropriations, loans, and other moneys from the State, any unit of federal,
State, or local government, or any other person, firm, or entity to defray the
costs of administering and operating the Program.
(9) If necessary, determine the eligibility of an employer, employee, or other
individual to participate in the Program.
(10) Adopt rules it deems necessary or advisable for the implementation of this
Part and the administration and operation of the Program.
(11) Cause expenses incurred to initiate, implement, maintain, and administer the
Program to be paid from contributions to, or investment returns or assets of,
the Program or other money collected by or for the Program or pursuant to
arrangements established under the Program to the extent permitted under
federal and State law.
(12) Invest and reinvest its funds in the Administrative Fund in accordance with
applicable State and federal laws.
(13) Make and enter into competitively procured contracts, agreements,
memoranda of understanding, partnerships, or other arrangements, to
collaborate and cooperate with, and to retain, employ, and contract with or for
any of the following to the extent necessary or desirable, for the effective and
efficient design, implementation, and administration of the Program
Senate Bill 110-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
consistent with the purposes set forth in this Part and to maximize outreach to
covered employers and covered employees:
a. Services of private and public financial institutions, depositories,
consultants, actuaries, counsel, auditors, investment advisors,
investment administrators, investment management firms, other
investment firms, third-party administrators, other professionals and
service providers, and State public retirement systems.
b. Research, technical, financial, administrative, and other services.
c. Services of other State agencies to assist the Board in the exercise of
its powers and duties.
(14) The Board may enter into an intergovernmental agreement or memorandum
of understanding with the State and any agency of the State to receive
outreach, technical assistance, enforcement and compliance services,
collection or dissemination of information pertinent to the Program subject to
such obligations of confidentiality as may be agreed to or required by law, or
other services or assistance. The State and any agencies of the State that enter
into such agreements or memoranda of understanding shall collaborate to
provide the outreach, assistance, information, and compliance or other
services or assistance to the Board. The memoranda of understanding may
cover the sharing of costs incurred in gathering and disseminating information
and the reimbursement of costs for any enforcement activities or assistance.
(15) Make and enter into contracts, agreements, memoranda of understanding,
arrangements, partnerships, or other arrangements to collaborate, cooperate,
coordinate, contract, or combine resources, investments, or administrative
functions with other governmental entities, including other states or their
agencies or instrumentalities that maintain or are establishing retirement
savings programs compatible with the Program, including collective,
common, or pooled investments with other funds of other states' programs
with which the assets of the Program and Trust are permitted by law to be
collectively invested, to the extent necessary or desirable for the effective and
efficient design, administration, and implementation of the Program
consistent with the purposes set forth in this Part, including the purpose of
achieving economies of scale and other efficiencies designed to minimize
costs for the Program.
(16) Develop and implement an education and outreach plan to gain input and
disseminate information regarding the North Carolina Work and Save
Program and retirement savings and financial literacy in general.
(17) Establish procedures for the timely and fair resolution of participant and other
disputes related to accounts or Program operation.
(18) Evaluate the need for, and procure if and as deemed necessary, pooled private
insurance against any and all loss in connection with the property, assets, or
activities of the Program.
(19) Borrow from the State, any unit of federal, State, or local government, or any
other person, firm, partnership, corporation, or other entity working capital
funds and other funds as may be necessary for this purpose, provided that such
funds are borrowed in the name of the Program and Board only and that any
such borrowings shall be payable solely from the revenues of the Program.
(20) Enter into long-term procurement contracts with one or more financial
providers that provide a fee structure that would assist the Program in avoiding
or minimizing the need to borrow or to rely upon general assets of the State.
Page 6 Senate Bill 110-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) In addition to the applicable prohibitions contained in Article 4 of Chapter 138A of
the General Statutes, a Board member, executive director, and other staff of the Board shall not
do any of the following:
(1) Directly or indirectly have any interest in the making of any investment under
the Program or in gains or profits accruing from any such investment.
(2) Borrow any Program-related funds or deposits or use any such funds or
deposits in any manner, for himself or herself or as an agent or partner of
others.
(3) Become an endorser, surety, or obligor on investments made under the
Program.
"§ 147-86.7G. Standard of conduct; fiduciary duty.
The Board, individual members of the Board, all persons serving as staff to the Program, and
any other agents appointed or engaged shall discharge their duties for the exclusive purpose of
providing benefits to the Program participants and administering the Program with discharge of
its duties and shall:
(1) Defray reasonable expenses in the administration of the Program.
(2) Govern Program investors with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence as a
prudent person acting in a like capacity would.
(3) Comply with all State ethics laws and regulations.
"§ 147-86.7J. Requirements for the North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings
Program.
The Program developed and established by the Board shall:
(1) Provide a process to facilitate voluntary enrollment into the Program for
covered employers, covered employees, and self-employed persons.
(2) Provide that the IRA to which contributions are made will be a Roth IRA,
except that the Board shall have the authority at any time to add an option for
all participants to affirmatively elect to contribute to a traditional IRA as an
alternative to the Roth IRA.
(3) Provide that the standard package shall be a Roth IRA with a target date fund
investment, and a contribution rate that begins at five percent (5%) of salary
or wages; provided, however, that the covered employee can choose to stop
participation altogether, to use a traditional IRA and a different investment
from among the options available, and to contribute at a higher or lower
contribution rate, subject to the IRA contribution dollar limits applicable
under the Internal Revenue Code.
(4) Provide on a uniform basis, if and when the Board so determines, in its
discretion, for annual increases of each participant's contribution rate, by not
more than one percent (1%) of salary or wages per year up to a maximum of
eight percent (8%). Any such increases shall apply to participants, as
determined by the Board, by default or only if initiated by affirmative
participant election included as part of the standard package, in either case
subject to the IRA contribution limits applicable under the Internal Revenue
Code.
(5) Allow a covered employer to withhold payroll deductions from a covered
employee's paycheck for the express purpose of making a covered employee
contribution to the Program funds.
(6) Include a process for direct deposit of contributions into covered employee
investments in the Program.
(7) Covered employers are not allowed to make employer contributions to the
covered employee's accounts.
Senate Bill 110-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(8) Allow for covered employees to make non-payroll contributions into an
account in addition to the covered employer payroll deducted amounts.
(9) Include an account reporting system that requires separate records and
accounting for each covered employer and covered employee enrolled.
(10) Include an account status notification process for covered employees to be
notified about and track their investments pursuant to this Part.
(11) Allow portability of benefits, including the ability to make tax-free rollovers
or transfers from accounts under the Program to other non-Program retirement
accounts or to tax-qualified plans that accept such rollovers or transfers
provided any rollover is initiated by the employee.
(12) Establish rules and procedures governing the distribution of funds from the
Program, including such distributions as may be permitted or required by the
Program and any applicable provisions of tax laws, with the objectives of
maximizing financial security in retirement, helping to protect spousal rights,
and assisting participants with the challenges of decumulation of savings. The
Board shall have the authority, in its discretion, to provide for one or more
reasonably priced distribution options to provide a source of fixed retirement
income, including income for life or for the participant's life expectancy (or
for joint lives and life expectancies, as applicable).
(13) Pool accounts as necessary under the Program for optimum investment
opportunity and return on investment outcomes.
(14) Be professionally managed.
(15) Provide a report on the status of each Program participant's account to each
Program participant at least annually.
(16) Provide that each Program participant owns the contributions to and earnings
on amounts contributed to the participant's account under this Part and that the
State, the Board, and covered employers have no proprietary interest, whether
legal or equitable, in those contributions or earnings.
(17) Keep total fees and expenses as low as practicable and in any event each year
not in excess of 100 basis points of the total assets of the Program, except that
this limit shall not apply during a start-up period of three years beginning with
the initial implementation of the Program.
(18) Be designed and implemented in a manner consistent with federal law,
including favorable federal tax treatment, to the extent that it applies and is
consistent with the Program not being preempted by ERISA.
(19) Ensure that the North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings Program
is designed to be financially self-sustaining over time.
(20) Provide that, if a covered employer fails to transmit a payroll deduction
contribution to the Program on the earliest date the amount withheld from the
covered employee's compensation can reasonably be segregated from the
covered employer's assets, but not later than the fifteenth day of the month
following the month in which the covered employee's contribution amounts
are withheld from his or her paycheck, the failure to remit such contributions
on a timely basis shall be subject to the same sanctions as employer
misappropriation of employee wage withholdings and to penalties.
"§ 147-86.7M. Rules for the North Carolina Work and Save Program.
The Board shall adopt rules to implement the Program that:
(1) Establish the processes for enrollment and contributions to Payroll Deduction
IRAs under the Program, including elections by covered employees,
withholding by covered employers of employee payroll deduction
contributions from wages and remittance for deposit to IRAs, and voluntary
Page 8 Senate Bill 110-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
enrollment and contributions by others, including self-employed individuals
and independent contractors, through payroll deduction or otherwise.
(2) Establish the processes for withdrawals, rollovers, and direct transfers from
IRAs under the Program in the interest of facilitating portability and
maximization of benefits.
(3) Establish processes for phasing in enrollment of eligible individuals.
(4) Conduct outreach to individuals, employers, other stakeholders, and the public
regarding the Program. Specify the contents, frequency, timing, and means of
required disclosures from the Program to covered employees, participants,
other individuals eligible to participate in the Program, covered employers,
and other interested parties. These disclosures shall include, but need not be
limited to:
a. The benefits associated with tax-favored retirement saving.
b. The potential advantages and disadvantages associated with
contributing to Roth IRAs and, if applicable, traditional IRAs under
the Program.
c. The eligibility rules for Roth IRAs and, if applicable, traditional IRAs.
d. That the individual and not the employer, the State, the Board, any
Board member or other State official, or the Program will be solely
responsible for determining whether and, if so, how much the
individual is eligible to contribute on a tax-favored basis to an IRA.
e. The penalty for excess contributions to IRAs and the method of
correcting excess contributions.
f. Instructions for enrolling, making elections to contribute or to decline
to contribute, and making elections regarding contribution rates, type
of IRA, and investments.
g. Instructions for implementing and for changing the elections.
h. The potential availability of a saver's tax credit, including the
eligibility conditions for the credit and instructions on how to claim it.
i. That employees seeking tax, investment, or other financial advice
should contact appropriate professional advisors, and that covered
employers are not in a position to provide such advice and are not
liable for decisions individuals make in relation to the Program.
j. That the payroll deduction IRAs are intended not to be
employer-sponsored retirement plans and that the Program is not an
employer-sponsored retirement plan.
k. The potential implications of account balances under the Program for
the application of asset limits under certain public assistance
programs.
l. That the account owner is solely responsible for investment
performance, including market gains and losses, and that IRA
accounts and rates of return are not guaranteed by any employer, the
State, the Board, any Board member or State official, or the Program.
m. Additional information about retirement and saving and other
information designed to promote financial literacy and capability
which may take the form of links to, or explanations of how to obtain,
such information.
n. How to obtain additional information about the Program.
"§ 147-86.7P. Protection from liability for covered employers.
(a) A covered employer or other employer is not and shall not be liable for or bear
responsibility for any of the following:
Senate Bill 110-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) An employee's decision to participate in or not to participate in the Program
or a participant's specific elections under the Program.
(2) Participants' or the Board's investment decisions.
(3) The administration, investment, investment returns, or investment
performance of the Program, including, without limitation, any interest rate or
other rate of return on any contribution or account balance, provided they play
no role.
(4) The Program design or the benefits paid to participants.
(5) Individuals' awareness of or compliance with the conditions and other
provisions of the tax laws that determine which individuals are eligible to
make tax-favored contributions to IRAs, in what amount, and in what time
frame and manner.
(6) Any loss, failure to realize any gain, or any other adverse consequences,
including, without limitation, any adverse tax consequences or loss of
favorable tax treatment, public assistance, or other benefits, incurred by any
person as a result of participating in the Program.
(b) No covered employer or other employer shall be, or shall be considered to be, a
fiduciary in relation to the Program or Trust or any other arrangement under the Program.
"§ 147-86.7R. Protection from liability for the State.
The State has no duty or liability to any party for the payment of any retirement savings
benefits accrued by any individual under the Program. The State, the Board, each member of the
Board, and the Program:
(1) Shall have no responsibility for compliance by individuals with the conditions
and other provisions of the Internal Revenue Code that determine which
individuals are eligible to make tax-favored contributions to IRAs, in what
amount, and in what time frame and manner.
(2) Shall have no duty, responsibility, or liability to any party for the payment of
any benefits under the Program, regardless of whether sufficient funds are
available under the Program to pay such benefits.
(3) Do not and shall not guarantee any interest rate or other rate of return on or
investment performance of any contribution or account balance.
(4) Shall have no liability or responsibility for any loss, deficiency, failure to
realize any gain, or any other adverse consequences incurred by any person as
a result of participating in the Program.
"§ 147-86.7T. Confidentiality of participant and account information.
Individual account information relating to accounts under the Program and relating to
individual participants, including, but not limited to, names, addresses, telephone numbers, email
addresses, personal identification information, investments, contributions, and earnings, is
confidential, is not a public record as defined in G.S. 132-1, and may not be disclosed except as
follows:
(1) To the extent necessary to administer the Program in a manner consistent with
this Part, the tax laws of this State, and the Internal Revenue Code; or
(2) To the extent that the individual who provides the information or is the subject
of the information expressly agrees in writing to the disclosure of the
information.
"§ 147-86.7V. Funding of Program.
The North Carolina Small Business Retirement Savings Administrative Fund is established,
to be held in trust separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the
Administrative Fund shall be credited to the Administrative Fund. Moneys in the Administrative
Fund are continuously appropriated to the Board. The Administrative Fund consists of:
(1) Moneys appropriated to the Administrative Fund by the General Assembly.
Page 10 Senate Bill 110-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Moneys transferred to the Administrative Fund from the federal government,
other State agencies, or local governments.
(3) Moneys from the payment of application, account, administrative, or other
fees and the payment of other moneys due the Board.
(4) Any gifts, donations, or grants made to the State for deposit in the
Administrative Fund.
(5) Earnings on moneys in the Administrative Fund.
"§ 147-86.7X. Annual report.
(a) The Board shall cause an accurate account of all of the Program's, Trust's, and Board's
activities, operations, receipts, and expenditures to be maintained. By October 1 of each year, the
Board shall submit to the Governor and the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental
Operations a report detailing the activities, operations, receipts, and expenditures of the Program
and Board during the preceding calendar year. The report shall also include projected activities
of the Program for the current calendar year and any necessary statutory recommendations and
appropriations.
(b) Each year, a full audit of the books and accounts of the Board pertaining to those
activities, operations, receipts and expenditures, personnel, services, or facilities shall be
conducted by a certified public accountant and shall include, but not be limited to, direct and
indirect costs attributable to the use of outside consultants, independent contractors, and any other
persons who are not State employees for the administration of the Program. For the purposes of
the audit, the auditors shall have access to the properties and records of the Program and Board
and may prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of periodic reports in relation to
projects undertaken by the Program.
"§ 147-86.7Z. Implementation.
(a) The Board shall establish the Program so that individuals can begin contributing
under the Program not later than July 1, 2027.
(b) The Board shall not implement the Program if and to the extent the Board determines
that the Program is preempted by ERISA. Accordingly, the Board shall implement the Program
in a severable fashion to the extent practicable if and to the extent that the Board determines:
(1) That a portion or aspect of the Program is preempted by ERISA, in which
event the Board shall not implement that portion or aspect of the Program but
shall proceed to implement the remainder of the Program to the extent
practicable; or
(2) That some but not all of the payroll deduction IRA arrangements or other
arrangements under the Program are or would be employee benefit plans
under ERISA, in which event the Board shall proceed to implement the
Program with respect to the other arrangements under the Program to the
extent practicable."
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
State Treasurer the sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. The Department shall allocate the funds to the North Carolina
Small Business Retirement Savings Program Board (Board) to be used for the following:
(1) To enable or facilitate the start-up and continuing operation, maintenance,
administration, and management of the North Carolina Small Business
Retirement Savings Program (Program) until the Program accumulates
sufficient balances and can generate sufficient funding through fees assessed
on Program accounts for the Program to become financially self-sustaining.
(2) To hire an individual to serve as the initial executive director pursuant to
G.S. 147-86.7D(a)(4). The position shall be filled on a time-limited basis, and
the individual filling the position shall not be considered a State employee.
Senate Bill 110-First Edition Page 11

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 12 Senate Bill 110-First Edition